California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(viii) Any shotgun with a revolving cylinder.

(ix) A semiautomatic, centerfire firearm that is not a rifle, pistol, or shotgun, that does not have a fixed magazine, but that has any one of the following:

(I) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon.

(II) A thumbhole stock.

(III) A folding or telescoping stock.

(IV) A grenade launcher or flare launcher.

(V) A flash suppressor.

(VI) A forward pistol grip.

(VII) A threaded
 barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer.

(VIII) A second handgrip.

(IX) A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely encircles, the barrel that allows the bearer to fire the weapon without burning the bearer’s hand, except a slide that encloses the barrel.

(X) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol grip.

(x) A semiautomatic, centerfire firearm that is not a rifle, pistol, or shotgun, that has a fixed magazine with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds.

(xi) A semiautomatic, centerfire firearm
 that is not a rifle, pistol, or shotgun, that has an overall length of less than 30 inches.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “fixed magazine” means an ammunition feeding device contained in, or permanently attached to, a firearm in such a manner that the device cannot be removed without disassembly of the firearm action.

(C) The Legislature finds a significant public purpose in exempting from the definition of “assault weapon” pistols that are designed expressly for use in Olympic target shooting events. Therefore, those pistols that are sanctioned by the International Olympic Committee and by USA Shooting, the national governing body for international shooting competition in the United States, and that were used for Olympic target shooting purposes as of January 1, 2001, and
 that would otherwise fall within the definition of “assault weapon” pursuant to this section are exempt, as provided in subparagraph (D).

(D) “Assault weapon” does not include either of the following:

(i) Any antique firearm.

(ii) Any of the following pistols, because they are consistent with the significant public purpose expressed in subparagraph (C):

MANUFACTURERMODELCALIBERBENELLIMP90.22LRBENELLIMP90.32 S&W LONGBENELLIMP95.22LRBENELLIMP95.32 S&W LONGHAMMERLI280.22LRHAMMERLI280.32 S&W LONGHAMMERLISP20.22LRHAMMERLISP20.32 S&W LONGPARDINIGPO.22 SHORTPARDINIGP-SCHUMANN.22 SHORTPARDINIHP.32 S&W LONGPARDINIMP.32 S&W LONGPARDINISP.22LRPARDINISPE.22LRWALTHERGSP.22LRWALTHERGSP.32 S&W LONGWALTHEROSP.22 SHORTWALTHEROSP-2000.22
 SHORT

(c) “Federally regulated firearm precursor part” means any firearm precursor part deemed to be a firearm pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto, and that has been imprinted with a serial number by a federal licensee authorized to serialize firearms in compliance with all applicable federal laws and regulations. 

(d) “Firearm” means a device, designed to be used as a weapon, from which is expelled through a barrel, a projectile by the force of an explosion or other
 form of combustion.

(e) (1) “Firearm precursor part” means any forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that has reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be completed, assembled or converted to be used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm, or that is marketed or
 sold to the public to become or be used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm once completed, assembled, or converted.

(2) Firearm parts that can only be used on antique firearms, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 16170 of the Penal Code, are not firearm precursor parts.

(f) “Unserialized firearm” means a firearm that does not have a serial number as required by law or has had its serial number altered or obliterated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.62.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, no person within this state may manufacture or cause to be manufactured, distribute, transport, or import into the state, or cause to be distributed, transported, or imported into the state, keep for sale, offer or expose for sale, or give or lend, any assault weapon, .50 BMG rifle, or unserialized firearm, except as provided in subdivisions (e) and (f) and in Section 22949.63.

(b) (1) Except as provided in
 paragraph (2), or except by operation of law, it shall be unlawful for a person to purchase, sell, offer to sell, or transfer ownership of any firearm precursor part in this state that is not a federally regulated firearm precursor part.

(2) This subdivision (b) shall not apply to all of the following:

(A) The purchase of a firearm precursor part that is not a federally regulated firearm precursor part by a federally licensed firearms manufacturer or importer, or by a federal licensee authorized to serialize firearms.

(B) The sale, offer to sell, or transfer of ownership of a firearm precursor part that is not a federally regulated firearm precursor part to a federally licensed firearms manufacturer or importer, or to a federal licensee authorized to serialize firearms.

(C) A common carrier licensed under state law, or a motor carrier, air carrier or carrier affiliated with an air carrier through common controlling interest that is subject to Title 49 of the United States Code, or an authorized agent of any such carrier, when acting in the course and scope of duties incident to the receipt, processing, transportation, or delivery of property.

(c) (1) A person licensed under Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, of the Penal Code shall not sell, supply, deliver, or give possession or control of a firearm to any person who is under 21 years of age.

(2) (A) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to or affect the sale, supplying, delivery, or giving possession or control of a firearm that is not a handgun or a semiautomatic centerfire rifle to a person 18
 years of age or older who possesses a valid, unexpired hunting license issued by the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(B) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to or affect the sale, supplying, delivery, or giving possession or control of a firearm that is not a handgun, semiautomatic centerfire rifle, completed frame or receiver, or firearm precursor part to a person who is 18 years of age or older and provides proper identification of being an honorably discharged member of the United States Armed Forces, the National Guard, the Air National Guard, or the active reserve components of the United States. For purposes of this subdivision, proper identification includes an Armed Forces Identification Card or other written documentation certifying that the individual is an honorably discharged member.

(C) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to or affect the sale, supplying, delivery, or giving
 possession or control of a firearm that is not a handgun to any of the following persons who are 18 years of age or older:

(i) An active peace officer, as described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of employment.

(ii) An active federal officer or law enforcement agent who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of employment.

(iii) A reserve peace officer, as described in Section 832.6 of the Penal Code, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of employment as a reserve peace officer.

(iv) A person who provides proper identification of active membership in the United States Armed Forces, the National
 Guard, the Air National Guard, or the active reserve components of the United States.

(d) The prohibitions described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) apply whether or not the firearm
 or firearm precursor part is misused or is intended to be misused in a criminal or unlawful manner.

(e) Subdivisions
 (a), (b), and (c) do not apply to the sale of an assault weapon, .50 BMG rifle, unserialized firearm, or firearm precursor part to, or the purchase, transport, importation, sale or other transfer, or manufacture of, an assault weapon, a .50 BMG rifle, unserialized firearm, or firearm precursor part by, any law enforcement agency, public entity that employs peace officers, or any authorized law enforcement representative thereof, if that person or entity is not prohibited by law from possessing an assault weapon, .50 BMG rifle, unserialized firearm, or firearm precursor part, including, without limitation, the Department of Justice, a police department or sheriffs’ or marshals’ office, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, a district attorneys’ office, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Department
 of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Cannabis Control, the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States, a law enforcement or military agency of another state, any federal law enforcement agency, or any foreign government or agency approved by the United States Department of State, for use in the discharge of the official duties of such entities.

(f) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to a person who is the executor or administrator of an estate that includes an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle registered under Article 5 (commencing with Section 30900) of
 Chapter 2 of Division 10 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, or that was possessed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30630 of the Penal Code, or a firearm assigned a serial number pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29180) of Division 7 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, that is disposed of as authorized by the probate court, if the disposition is otherwise permitted by Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 30400) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500), of Division 10 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.63.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22949.62, any licensed firearms dealer may take possession of any assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle from any person to whom it is legally registered or who has been issued a permit to possess it pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, or of any firearm precursor part, for the purposes of servicing or repair.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 22949.62, any licensed firearms dealer may transfer possession of any assault weapon, .50 BMG rifle, or firearm precursor part received pursuant to subdivision (a), to a gunsmith for purposes of repairing or servicing that weapon. A
 transfer is permissible only to the following persons:

(1) A gunsmith employed the dealer.

(2) A gunsmith with whom the dealer has contracted for gunsmithing services.

(c) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) applies only if the gunsmith receiving the assault weapon, .50 BMG rifle, or firearm precursor part meets both of the following qualifications:

(1) The gunsmith holds a dealer license issued pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(2) The gunsmith holds any business license required by a state or local
 governmental entity.

(d) In addition to the uses permitted in Chapter 1.5 (commencing
 with Section 30400) of, and Article 5 (commencing with Section 30900) of Chapter 2 of, Division 10 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, any licensed gun dealer who lawfully possesses an assault weapon, .50 BMG rifle, or firearm precursor part pursuant to those provisions may do either of the following:

(1) Transport the firearm or firearm precursor part between dealers or out of the state if that person is permitted pursuant to the National Firearms Act. Any transporting allowed by this section or Section 22949.62 shall be in compliance with Sections 16850 and 25610 of the Penal Code.

(2) Sell the firearm or firearm precursor part to a resident outside the state.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 22949.62, any
 individual may, provided that the assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle is transported in compliance with Sections 16850 and 25610 of the Penal Code, do any of the following:

(1) Arrange in advance to relinquish an assault weapon, .50 BMG rifle, unserialized firearm, or firearm precursor part to a police or sheriff’s department.

(2) Sell, deliver, or transfer an assault weapon, .50 BMG rifle, unserialized firearm, or firearm precursor part to an authorized representative of a city, city and county, county, or state government, or of the federal government, provided that the entity is acquiring the weapon as part of an authorized, voluntary program in which the entity is buying or receiving weapons from private individuals.

(3) Transfer, relinquish, or dispose of a firearm or precursor part in compliance with the requirements of Section 29810 or Section 29830 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.64.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the requirements of this chapter shall be enforced exclusively through the private civil actions described in Section 22949.65. No enforcement of this chapter may be taken or threatened by this state, a political subdivision, a district or county or city attorney, or an executive or administrative officer or employee of this state or a political subdivision against any person, except as provided in Section 22949.65.

(b) The fact that conduct violates this chapter shall not be an independent basis for enforcement of any other law of this state, or the denial, revocation, suspension, or withholding of any right or
 privilege conferred by the law of this state or a political subdivision, or a threat to do the same, by this state, a political subdivision, a district or county or city attorney, or an executive or administrative officer or employee of this state or a political subdivision, or a board, commission, or similar body assigned authority to do so under law, against any person, except as provided in Section 22949.65. Nor shall any civil action predicated upon a violation of this chapter be brought by this state, a political subdivision, a district or county or city attorney, or an executive or administrative officer or employee of this state or a political subdivision. For avoidance of doubt, the rights and privileges described by this subdivision include, but are not limited to, any business licenses and permits issued pursuant to this code or any firearms, ammunition, or precursor parts dealer or vendor licenses issued
 pursuant to Title 4 (commencing with Section 23500) of Part 6 of the Penal Code. This subdivision shall not be construed to prevent or limit enforcement of any other law regulating conduct
 that also violates this chapter, including, but not limited to, Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 30400) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not be construed to do any of the following:

(1) Legalize the conduct prohibited by this chapter or by Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 30400) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(2) Waive any requirements prescribed in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29180) of Division 7 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(3) Limit
 or affect the availability of a remedy established by Section 22949.65.

(4) Limit the enforceability of any other laws that regulate or prohibit any conduct relating to firearms or firearm precursor parts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.65.

(a) Any person, other than an officer or employee of a state or local governmental entity in this state, may bring a civil action against any person who does any of the following:

(1) Knowingly violates Section 22949.62.

(2) Knowingly engages in conduct that aids or abets a violation of Section 22949.62, regardless of whether the person knew or should have known that the person aided or abetted would be violating Section 22949.62.

(3) Knowingly commits an act with the intent to engage in the conduct described by paragraph (1) or (2).

(b) If a claimant prevails in an action brought under this section, the court shall award all of the following:

(1) Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the defendant from violating this chapter or engaging in acts that aid or abet violations of this chapter.

(2) (A) (i) Statutory damages in an amount of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each weapon or firearm precursor part as to which the defendant violated Section 22949.62, and for each weapon or firearm precursor part as to which the defendant aided or abetted a violation of Section 22949.62.

(ii) This subparagraph shall remain in effect unless found by a
 court to be invalid or unconstitutional, in which case this subparagraph is repealed and subparagraph (B) shall become operational.

(B) (i) A civil penalty in an appropriate amount to be determined by the court for each violation of this chapter. In making that determination, the court shall consider factors that include, but are not limited to, the number of firearms or precursor parts involved in the defendant’s violation of this chapter, the duration of the prohibited conduct, whether the defendant has previously violated this chapter or any other federal, state, or local law concerning the regulation of firearms, and any other factors tending to increase the risk to the public, such as proximity of the violations to sensitive places.

(ii) This
 subparagraph shall become effective only if a court finds subparagraph (A) to be invalid or unconstitutional.

(3) Attorney’s fees and costs.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a court shall not award relief under this section in response to a violation of subdivision (a) if the defendant demonstrates that the defendant previously paid the full amount of any monetary award under subdivision (b) in a previous action for each weapon or firearm precursor part as to which the defendant violated, or aided or abetted a violation of, Section 22949.62.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a cause of action under this section shall be extinguished unless the action is brought not later than four years after the cause of action
 accrues.

(e) An act or omission in violation of Section 22949.62 shall be deemed an injury in fact to all residents of, and visitors to, this state, and any such person shall have standing to bring a civil action pursuant to this section.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, none of the following is a defense to an action brought under this section:

(1) A defendant’s ignorance or mistake of law.

(2) A defendant’s belief that the requirements of this chapter are unconstitutional or were unconstitutional.

(3) A defendant’s reliance on any court decision that has been overruled on appeal or by a subsequent
 court, even if that court decision had not been overruled when the defendant engaged in conduct that violates this chapter.

(4) A defendant’s reliance on any state or federal court decision that is not binding on the court in which the action has been brought.

(5) Nonmutual issue preclusion or nonmutual claim preclusion.

(6) Any claim that the enforcement of this chapter or the imposition of civil liability against the defendant will violate a constitutional right of a third party.

(7) A defendant’s assertion that this chapter proscribes conduct that is separately prohibited by the Penal Code or any other law of this state, or that this chapter proscribes
 conduct beyond that which is already prohibited by the Penal Code or any other law of this state.

(8) Any claim that the firearm or firearm precursor part at issue was not misused, or was not intended to be misused, in a criminal or unlawful manner.

(g) (1) Both of the following are affirmative defenses to an action brought under this section:

(A) A person sued under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) reasonably believed, after conducting a reasonable investigation, that the person aided or abetted
 was complying with this chapter.

(B) A person sued under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) reasonably believed, after conducting a reasonable investigation, that the person was complying with this chapter or was aiding or abetting another who was complying with this chapter.

(2) The defendant has the burden of proving an affirmative defense under this subdivision by a preponderance of the evidence.

(h) This section shall not be construed to impose liability on any speech or conduct protected by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, as made applicable to the states through the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution, or by Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, this state, a state official, or a district, county, or city attorney shall not intervene in an action brought under this section. However, this subdivision does not prohibit a person described by this subdivision from filing an amicus curiae brief in the action.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, a court shall not award attorney’s fees or costs to a defendant in an action brought under this section.

(k) An action pursuant to this section shall not be brought against a federal government, state, political subdivision, or an employee of a federal government, state, or political subdivision on the basis of acts or omissions in the course of discharge of official duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.66.

(a) A defendant against whom an action is brought under Section 22949.65 does not have standing to assert the right of another individual to keep and bear arms under the Second Amendment to the United States Constitution as a defense to liability under that section unless either of the following is true:

(1) The United States Supreme Court holds that the courts of this state must confer standing on that defendant to assert the third-party rights of other individuals in state court as a matter of federal constitutional law.

(2) The defendant has standing to assert the rights of other individuals
 under the tests for third-party standing established by the United States Supreme Court.

(b) A defendant in an action brought under Section 22949.65 may assert an affirmative defense to liability under this section if both of the following are true:

(1) The defendant has standing to assert the third-party right of an individual to keep and bear arms in accordance with subdivision (a).

(2) The defendant demonstrates that the relief sought by the claimant will violate a third-party’s rights under the Second Amendment to the United States Constitution right as defined by clearly established case law of the United States Supreme Court.

(c) Nothing in this section shall
 in any way limit or preclude a defendant from asserting the defendant’s personal constitutional rights as a defense to liability under Section 22949.65, and a court shall not award relief under Section 22949.65 if the conduct for which the defendant has been sued was an exercise of a state or federal constitutional right that personally belongs to the defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.67.

This chapter shall not be construed to do any of the following:

(a) Authorize the initiation of a cause of action under this chapter against a person purchasing, obtaining, or attempting to purchase or obtain an assault weapon, .50 BMG rifle, unserialized firearm, or firearm precursor part from a person acting in violation of this chapter.

(b) Wholly or partly repeal, either expressly or by implication, any other statute that regulates or prohibits any conduct relating to
 firearms or firearm precursor parts, including, but not limited to, Chapters 1.5 and 2 (commencing with Sections 30400 and 30500, respectively) of Division 10 of Title 4 of Part 6 and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29180) of Division 7 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(c) Restrict a political subdivision from regulating or prohibiting conduct relating to assault weapons, .50 BMG rifles, unserialized firearms, or firearm precursor parts in a manner that is at least as stringent as the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.68.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a civil action brought under Section 22949.65 shall be brought in any of the following:

(1) The county in which all or a substantial part of the events or omissions giving rise to the claim occurred.

(2) The county of residence for any one of the natural person defendants at the time the cause of action accrued.

(3) The county of the principal office in this state of any one of the defendants that is not a natural person.

(4) The county of residence
 for the claimant if the claimant is a natural person residing in this state.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, if a civil action is brought under Section 22949.65 in one of the venues described by subdivision (a), the action shall not be transferred to a different venue without the written consent of all parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.69.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, this state has sovereign immunity, a political subdivision has governmental immunity, and each officer and employee of this state or a political subdivision has official immunity in any action, claim, or counterclaim or any type of legal or equitable action that challenges the validity of any provision or application of this chapter, on constitutional grounds or otherwise.

(b) A provision of state law shall not be construed to waive or abrogate an immunity described by subdivision (a) unless it expressly waives immunity under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.70.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that every provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, and word in this chapter, and every application of the provisions in this chapter, are severable from each other.

(b) If any application of any provision in this chapter to any person, group of persons, or circumstances is found by a court to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remaining applications of that provision to all other persons and circumstances shall be severed and shall not be affected. All constitutionally valid applications of this chapter shall be severed from any applications that a court finds to be invalid, leaving the valid applications in
 force, because it is the Legislature’s intent and priority that the valid applications be allowed to stand alone. Even if a reviewing court finds a provision of this chapter to impose an unconstitutional burden in a large or substantial fraction of relevant cases, the applications that do not present an unconstitutional burden shall be severed from the remaining applications and shall remain in force, and shall be treated as if the Legislature had enacted a statute limited to the persons, group of persons, or circumstances for which the statute’s application does not present an unconstitutional burden. If any court declares or finds a provision of this chapter facially unconstitutional, when discrete applications of that provision can be enforced against a person, group of persons, or circumstances without violating the United States Constitution and the California Constitution, those applications
 shall be severed from all remaining applications of the provision, and the provision shall be interpreted as if the Legislature had enacted a provision limited to the persons, group of persons, or circumstances for which the provision’s application will not violate the United States Constitution and the California Constitution.

(c) The Legislature further declares that it would have enacted this chapter, and each provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, and word, and all constitutional applications of this chapter, irrespective of the fact that any provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, or word, or application of this chapter, were to be declared unconstitutional or to represent an unconstitutional burden.

(d) If any provision of this
 chapter is found by any court to be unconstitutionally vague, then the applications of that provision that do not present constitutional vagueness problems shall be severed and remain in force.

(e) A court shall not decline to enforce the severability requirements of this section on the ground that severance would rewrite the statute or involve the court in legislative or lawmaking activity. A court that declines to enforce or enjoins a state official from enforcing a statutory provision of this chapter does not rewrite a statute, as the statute continues to contain the same words as before the court’s decision. Each of the following is true about a judicial injunction or declaration of unconstitutionality of a provision of this chapter:

(1) It is nothing more than an edict
 prohibiting enforcement that may subsequently be vacated by a later court if that court has a different understanding of the requirements of the California Constitution or the United States Constitution.

(2) It is not a formal amendment of the language in a statute.

(3) It no more rewrites a statute than a decision by the executive not to enforce a duly-enacted statute in a limited and defined set of circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Section 22949.71.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

22949.71.

This chapter shall become inoperative upon invalidation of Subchapter H (commencing with Section 171.201) of Chapter 171 of the Texas Health and Safety Code in its entirety by a final decision of the United States Supreme Court or Texas Supreme Court, and is repealed on January 1 of the following year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.   Note: Repeal affects Ch. 38, commencing with Section 22949.60.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 39. Marketing Firearms to Minors [22949.80. - 22949.80.]

22949.80.

(a) (1) A firearm industry member shall not advertise, market, or arrange for placement of an advertising or marketing communication offering or promoting any firearm-related product in a manner that is designed, intended, or reasonably appears to be attractive to minors.

(2) In determining whether marketing or advertising of a firearm-related product is attractive to minors, as described in paragraph (1), a court shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including, but not limited to, whether the marketing or advertising:

(A) Uses caricatures that reasonably appear to be minors or cartoon characters to promote firearm-related products.

(B) Offers brand name merchandise for minors, including, but not limited to, hats, t-shirts, or other clothing, or toys, games, or stuffed animals, that promotes a firearm industry member or firearm-related product.

(C) Offers firearm-related products in sizes, colors, or designs that are specifically designed to be used by, or appeal to, minors.

(D) Is part of a marketing or advertising campaign designed with the intent to appeal to minors.

(E) Uses images or depictions of minors in advertising and marketing materials to depict the use of firearm-related products.

(F) Is placed in a publication created for the purpose of reaching an audience that is predominately composed of minors and not intended for a more general audience composed of adults.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to a communication offering or promoting any firearm safety program, hunting safety or promotional program, firearm instructional course, sport shooting event or competition, or any similar program, course, or event, nor does it apply to a communication offering or promoting membership in any organization, or promotion of lawful hunting activity, including, but not limited to, any fundraising event, youth hunting program, or outdoor camp.

(b) A firearm industry member publishing material directed
 to minors in this state or who has actual knowledge that a minor in this state is using or receiving its material, shall not knowingly use, disclose, compile, or allow a third party to use, disclose, or compile, the personal information of that minor with actual knowledge that the use, disclosure, or compilation is for the purpose of marketing or advertising to that minor any firearm-related product.

(c) As used in this chapter:

(1) “Ammunition” has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 16150 of the Penal Code.

(2) “Firearm” has the same meaning as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16520 of the Penal Code.

(3) “Firearm accessory” means an attachment or device designed or adapted to be inserted into, affixed onto, or
 used in conjunction with, a firearm which is designed, intended, or functions to alter or enhance the firing capabilities of a firearm, the lethality of the firearm, or a shooter’s ability to hold, carry, or use a firearm.

(4) “Firearm industry member” means any of the following:

(A) A person, firm, corporation, company, partnership, society, joint stock company, or any other entity or association engaged in the manufacture, distribution, importation, marketing, wholesale, or retail sale of firearm-related products.

(B) A person, firm, corporation, company, partnership, society, joint stock company, or any other entity or association formed for the express purpose of promoting, encouraging, or advocating for the purchase, use, or ownership of firearm-related products that does one of the following:

(i) Advertises firearm-related products.

(ii) Advertises events where firearm-related products are sold or used.

(iii) Endorses specific firearm-related products.

(iv) Sponsors or otherwise promotes events at which firearm-related products are sold or used.

(5) “Firearm-related product” means a firearm, ammunition, reloaded ammunition, a firearm precursor part, a firearm component, or a firearm accessory that meets any of the following conditions:

(A) The item is sold, made, or distributed in California.

(B) The item is intended to be sold or distributed in
 California.

(C) It is reasonably foreseeable that the item would be sold or possessed in California.

(D) Marketing or advertising for the item is directed to residents of California.

(6) “Marketing or advertising” means, in exchange for monetary compensation, to make a communication to one or more individuals, or to arrange for the dissemination to the public of a communication, about a product, the primary purpose of which is to encourage recipients of the communication to
 engage in a commercial transaction.

(7) “Minor” means a natural person under 18 years of age who resides in this state.

(d) This section shall not be construed to require or authorize a firearm industry member to collect or retain age information about users or subscribers of products or services offered.

(e) (1) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) The court shall impose a civil penalty under paragraph (1) for each violation of this chapter. In assessing the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider any one or more of the relevant circumstances presented by any of the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, the nature and seriousness of the misconduct, the number of violations, the persistence of the misconduct, the length of time over which the misconduct occurred, the willfulness of the defendant’s misconduct, and the defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(3) A person harmed by a violation of this section may commence a civil action to recover their actual damages.

(4) The court shall also order injunctive relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order against the person or persons
 responsible for the conduct, as the court deems necessary to prevent the harm described in this section.

(5) Upon a motion, a court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees and other litigation expenses, to a plaintiff who is a prevailing party in an action brought pursuant to this section.

(6) Each copy or republication of marketing or advertising prohibited by this section shall be deemed a separate violation.

(f) The provisions of this section are severable. If any portion, subdivision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, word, or application of this section is for any reason held to be invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, that decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have
 adopted this section and each and every portion, subdivision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, word, and application not declared invalid or unconstitutional without regard to whether any other portion of this section or application thereof would be subsequently declared invalid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (AB 160)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 42. Grocery and Pharmacy Establishment Closures [22949.92. - 22949.92.2.]

22949.92.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:
